Washington statutes.
RCW 19.144.050

Negative amortization—Limitation.

A financial institution may not make or facilitate a residential mortgage loan that includes any provisions that impose negative amortization and which are subject to the interagency guidance on nontraditional mortgage product risks and the statement on subprime mortgage lending.

[ 2008 c 108 s 6.]